District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.01

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925.”

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1119, ch. 443, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-581 and § 50-1501.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-701.
1973 Ed., § 40-601.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 101 to 104 of Prohibition on the Reckless Operation of Recreational Motor Vehicles Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-462, June 23, 2004, 51 DCR 6750).

Mayor's Orders

Establishment—Task Force on Transportation, see Mayor’s Order 2001-147, October 3, 2001 ( 48 DCR 9522).